Washington statutes.
RCW 15.24.200

Penalties.

(1) Any person who violates or aids in the violation of any provision of this chapter is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

(2) Any person who violates or aids in the violation of any rule or regulation of the commission is guilty of a misdemeanor.

[ 2003 c 53 s 104; 1961 c 11 s 15.24.200. Prior: 1937 c 195 s 14; RRS s 2874-14.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.